Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1895.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-119.2 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section, “community eligibility provision”
means the federal provision created pursuant to 42 U.S.C., Section
1759a that allows school districts to choose to receive federal
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1895 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

spec ial assistance payments for school meals in exchange for
providing free school meals to all students enrolled in all or
selected school sites within the school district.
B. Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each public school
district in this state shall annually identify the number of
students enrolled in the district who are directly certified to
receive free or reduced-price school breakfasts and lunches. For
the purposes of this section, “directly certified” means students
who:
1. Participate in Medicaid;
2. Participate in the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
(SNAP);
3. Participate in the Food Distribution Program on Indian
Reservations (FDPIR);
4. Participate in Temporary Assistance for Needy Families
(TANF); or
5. Are homeless, transient, or in foster care.
C. Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the board of
education of a public school district in which all school sites are
eligible to receive the federal special assistance payments for all
reimbursable school breakfasts and lunches served pursuant to the
community eligibility provision shall annually adopt a resolution
indicating its degree of participation, if any, in the community
eligibility provision. If a school district is unable to
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1895 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

part icipate in the community eligibility provision because doing so
would cause financial hardship, the school district board of
education shall adopt a resolution reflecting such information. The
school district board of education shall consider the resolution
during the same meeting the school district budget is considered,
and the agenda for such meeting shall reflect the resolution to be
considered.
D. Each public school district shall ensure that parents and
legal guardians of students enrolled in the district who are
eligible for free and reduced-price meals receive the necessary
applications and instructions for participation. Upon request, a
school district shall provide assistance in completing the
applications.
E. If a student is unable to pay for a meal or accrues school
meal debt, the public school district in which the student is
enrolled shall not publicly identify or penalize the student in any
way including, but not limited to, denying a meal, serving an
alternative meal, discarding a meal after serving it to the student,
requiring chores or work in exchange for a meal, prohibiting the
student from participating in extracurricular activities, denying
the student from participating in graduation, withholding the
student’s diploma, or refusing to fulfill the student’s requests for
transcripts.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1895 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION
March 3, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS



















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1895 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)